North Carolina, session 2025, HB1210.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

FIREARM SAFETY INSTRUCTION
SECTION 1.(a) Subsection (c) of G.S. 143B-1209.100 is amended by adding two
new subdivisions to read:
"(12) Develop, in consultation with any local or State entity the Center for Safer
Schools deems necessary to consult with, firearm safety instruction for
students that meets all of the following requirements:
a. The instruction shall teach students all of the following:
1. Safe storage and handling of firearms, including instruction on
(i) loading and unloading a firearm, (ii) using the safety on a
firearm, and (iii) determining if a firearm is loaded or
unloaded.
2. How to avoid injury if the student finds a firearm.
3. To never touch a found firearm.
4. To immediately notify an adult of the location of a found
firearm.
5. How to provide basic first aid and how to contact emergency
services.
b. The instruction shall be viewpoint neutral on political topics, such as
firearm rights, firearm violence, and the Second Amendment to the
United States Constitution.
c. The instruction shall not include the use or presence of live
ammunition, live fire, or live firearms.
d. The instruction shall be age- and grade-appropriate.
*H1210-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
e. The instruction required under this subdivision shall be provided in a
classroom setting by a live instructor who is an active or retired law
enforcement officer or is certified by the North Carolina Criminal
Justice Education and Training Standards Commission, the United
States Concealed Carry Association, or the National Rifle Association.
(13) Develop, in consultation with any local or State entity the Center for Safer
Schools deems necessary to consult with, instruction for students on
de-escalation techniques for conflict or other stressful situations. The
instruction shall meet all of the following requirements:
a. The instruction shall be viewpoint neutral on political topics.
b. The instruction shall be age- and grade-appropriate.
c. The instruction required under this subdivision shall be provided in a
classroom setting by a live instructor who is a behavioral or mental
health professional who has training or experience working with
adolescents and children."
SECTION 1.(b) Article 8C of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-105.50. Firearm safety and de-escalation instruction.
(a) Requirement. – Each public school unit shall require each school under its control to
provide annually to its students the firearm safety and de-escalation instruction developed under
subdivisions (12) and (13) of subsection (c) of G.S. 143B-1209.100. The instruction required
under this section shall begin in kindergarten.
(b) Opt out. – The parent or legal guardian of a student subject to instruction under this
section shall be allowed to opt out of either or both the firearm safety and de-escalation
instruction on behalf of the student. A request to opt out only applies to the school year in which
the request is made and the parent or legal guardian must renew the request for each school year
the parent or legal guardian wants the student to opt out of either or both the firearm safety and
de-escalation instruction. The State Board of Education shall establish the process for submitting
a request to opt out of the instruction required under this section."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-76.25(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(13) The right to opt out of either or both the firearm safety and de-escalation
instruction for their child pursuant to G.S. 115C-105.50(b)."
SECTION 1.(d) The Center for Safer Schools and the State Board of Education may
use the procedure set forth in G.S. 150B-21.1 to adopt or amend any rules necessary to implement
the provisions of this act.
SECTION 1.(e) The instruction required under G.S. 115C-105.50, as enacted by
Section 2 of this act, shall be provided beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 1.(f) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Center for Safer
Schools the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to cover any costs associated with developing the instruction in
accordance with subdivisions (12) and (13) of subsection (c) of G.S. 143B-1209.100, as enacted
by Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 1.(g) Subsection (f) of this section becomes effective July 1, 2026. The
remainder of this section is effective when it becomes law.

CONCEALED HANDGUN PERMIT/ALLOW STATEWIDE SEARCH OF
INVOLUNTARY COMMITMENT RECORDS
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 14-415.14(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Any person or entity who is presented by the applicant or by the sheriff with an
original or photocopied release form as described in G.S. 14-415.13(a)(5) shall promptly disclose
Page 2 House Bill 1210-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to the sheriff any records concerning the mental health or capacity of the applicant who signed
the form and authorized the release of the records. A clerk of court who is presented with an
original or photocopied release form as described in G.S. 14-415.13(a)(5) shall conduct an
electronic Statewide search for, and promptly disclose to the sheriff, any records concerning the
mental health or capacity of the applicant who signed the form and authorized the release of the
records."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 122C-54(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any individual seeking confidential
information contained in the court files or the court records of a proceeding made pursuant to
Article 5 of this Chapter may file a written motion in the cause setting out why the information
is needed. A district court judge may issue an order to disclose the confidential information
sought if he finds the order is appropriate under the circumstances and if he finds that it is in the
best interest of the individual admitted or committed or of the public to have the information
disclosed.
Counsel for the respondent and counsel for the State in the commitment hearing may receive
access to the court file without filing a motion or obtaining a court order. A judge presiding over
a criminal case that initiated the Article 5 proceeding may have access to the file without filing a
motion.
Judicial officials determining whether a criminal defendant may be released before trial
pursuant to G.S. 15A-533 may have access to the defendant's records of proceedings made
pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter for the purposes of determining whether a criminal defendant
has been involuntarily committed within the previous three years.
An applicant for a concealed handgun permit, or a sheriff, who presents an original or
photocopied release form as described in G.S. 14-415.13(a)(5) may have access to the applicant's
records of proceedings made pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter for the purpose of determining
the mental health or capacity of the applicant."
SECTION 2.(c) No later than the effective date of subsections (a) and (b) of this
section, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop and implement a process or system
that allows for an electronic Statewide search described in G.S. 14-415.14(c), as amended by
subsection (a) of this section. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
Administrative Office of the Courts may use any funds available for the implementation or
maintenance of eCourts to cover any costs incurred from developing and implementing a process
or system in accordance with this subsection.
SECTION 2.(d) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section become effective December
1, 2026, and apply to applications on or after that date. The remainder of this section is effective
when it becomes law.

MODIFY AUTHORITY OF MAGISTRATES AND JUDGES TO ISSUE ORDER FOR
INVOLUNTARY COMMITMENT
SECTION 3.(a) Article 18 of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 7A-201. Involuntary commitments.
(a) Authority. – Except as otherwise provided by law, if a magistrate or presiding judge
over a civil or criminal matter has reasonable grounds to believe a party to a proceeding before
the magistrate or judge meets the criteria for involuntary commitment under Part 7 of Article 5
of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, the magistrate or judge shall be vested with the authority
sua sponte to make findings of fact and issue a custody order in the same manner, upon the same
grounds, and with the same effect as an order issued by a clerk or magistrate pursuant to
G.S. 122C-261. Proceedings thereafter are in accordance with Part 7 of Article 5 of Chapter 122C
of the General Statutes.
House Bill 1210-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Recusal. – A magistrate or judge who issues an order pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section is disqualified from presiding over any other hearing pursuant to Part 7 of Article 5
of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes for a respondent who was the subject of the order issued
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Construction. – Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, nothing
in this section shall be construed as amending or otherwise altering the duties of a magistrate or
judge set forth in Part 7 of Article 5 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 122C-261(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) Except as provided in subdivision (5) of subsection (d) of this section, upon receipt
of the custody order of the clerk or magistrate ormagistrate, a custody order issued by the court
pursuant to G.S. 15A-1003, or a custody order issued pursuant to G.S. 7A-201, a law
enforcement officer, person designated under G.S. 122C-251(g), or other person identified in the
order shall take the respondent into custody within 24 hours after the order is signed, and proceed
according to G.S. 122C-263. The custody order is valid throughout the State.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, in no event shall an individual known or
reasonably believed to have an intellectual disability be admitted to a State psychiatric hospital,
except the following:
(1) Persons described in G.S. 122C-266(b).
(2) Persons admitted pursuant to G.S. 15A-1321.
(3) Respondents who are so extremely dangerous as to pose a serious threat to the
community and to other patients committed to non-State hospital psychiatric
inpatient units, as determined by the Director of the Division of Mental
Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services or the
Director's designee.
(4) Respondents who are so gravely disabled by both multiple disorders and
medical fragility or multiple disorders and deafness that alternative care is
inappropriate, as determined by the Director of the Division of Mental Health,
Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services or the Director's
designee.
Individuals transported to a State facility for individuals with mental illnesses who are not
admitted by the facility may be transported by appropriate law enforcement officers or designated
staff of the State facility in State-owned vehicles to an appropriate 24-hour facility that provides
psychiatric inpatient care.
No later than 24 hours after the transfer, the responsible professional at the original facility
shall notify the petitioner, the clerk of court, and, if consent is granted by the respondent, the next
of kin, that the transfer has been completed."
SECTION 3.(c) This section becomes effective October 1, 2026, and applies to
proceedings on or after that date.

PILOT CO-RESPONDER POLICE PROGRAM
SECTION 4.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Safety for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium the nonrecurring sum of four
hundred seventy-four thousand six hundred eighty dollars ($474,680) to allocate to each county
in this State in equal amounts to use to fund pilot program co-responder models designed to
integrate mental health professionals with law enforcement responding to mental health related
calls by people in distress needing assistance. The funds shall be used to hire and integrate within
the law enforcement agency of each locality identified below one full-time mental health
professional to be paired with law enforcement, either on a dedicated team or as part of a
specialized unit, in responding to calls and incidences identified as involving mental health crises
or persons with mental health issues.
SECTION 4.(b) This section is effective retroactive to July 1, 2025.
Page 4 House Bill 1210-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 1210-First Edition Page 5